Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
In General

§ 43-5-1.
State Board of Education to be Board of Trustees of Mississippi School for the Deaf and Mississippi School for the Blind; no consolidation of schools required.

The State Board of Education shall be the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind. Wherever the term Board of Trustees of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and Mississippi School for the Blind appears in any law the same shall mean the State Board of Education.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require any consolidation or combination of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind other than where economies can be realized through the common utilization of maintenance personnel and equipment, physical facilities, vehicles and administrative personnel, where the same can be done without impairment of the effectiveness of the educational programs of the two (2) institutions or the welfare of the students.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require any consolidation of services involving curriculum or instructional programs of the two (2) institutions.

The State Board of Education, on behalf of each of these institutions, shall have the power to receive and hold property, real and personal, and to accept and use as provided by law, separate from the needs of the other institutions, all bequests, devices and donations made or which may in the future be made to or for it, and shall continue to enjoy the rights and privileges heretofore conferred upon it by law and such as are necessary now, or hereafter, to accomplish the purposes of its own establishment and operation and maintenance hereunder, provided that the same be not inconsistent with or in conflict with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 9, art. 43; 1857, ch. 13, art. 2, ch. 14, art. 2; 1871, §§ 2104, 2112; 1880, §§ 669, 678; 1892, §§ 2310, 2320, 2321; 1906, §§ 2539, 2548, 2549; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4993, 5008, 5009; 1930, §§ 7295, 7304, 7305; 1942, § 6785; Laws, 1924, ch. 309; Laws, 1924, ch. 310; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 142; Laws, 1991, ch. 534, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 43-5-2.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 144]

§ 43-5-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 143, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 6785-01; Laws, 1936, ch. 180; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 529; Laws, 1985, ch. 448]

§ 43-5-4.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544 § 145, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Laws, 1989, ch. 544 § 145]

§ 43-5-5.
Powers and duties of Board.

The State Board of Education shall adopt all needful rules and regulations for the government of the schools. The State Board of Education shall have authority and control over the pupils and over the properties of each school except where otherwise prescribed by law. The State Board of Education shall provide and maintain libraries for each school, and shall provide for proper and needful recreational facilities for the pupils of the separate schools, and encourage their physical and hygienic and religious advancement, including facilities for church attendances on the Sabbath.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6785-02; Laws, 1936, ch. 180; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 338; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 146; Laws, 1992, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 43-5-7.
Powers and duties of State Superintendent of Schools.

The State Superintendent of Education, or his designee, shall make regular and frequent inspections of each of the two (2) schools, and shall personally visit each school at least once a month during every school session, and shall prescribe when and where and by whom and in what quantities all supplies and sustenance of every kind shall be purchased. As far as practicable the purchases for each school shall be on basis of wholesale rather than at retail prices. The State Superintendent of Education shall prepare in writing, monthly, the status of the schools and needs, and the physical and moral conditions of the pupils, and they shall require that the records of each school are preserved, and shall assume such duties as may through legislative enactment hereafter be placed upon the State Superintendent of Education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6785-03; Laws, 1936, ch. 180; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 147, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-5-8.
Superintendents of Schools for Blind and Deaf; appointment; powers and duties; budget responsibilities.

The Superintendent of the School for the Blind and the Superintendent of the School for the Deaf and all principals and directors shall be selected by and hold office subject to the will and pleasure of the State Superintendent of Education, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education may provide housing for the two (2) superintendents so employed either on- or off-campus. Each superintendent shall at all times maintain supervision of the physical properties of the school he serves unless otherwise provided. All other personnel shall be competitively appointed by the state superintendent and shall be dismissed only for cause in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. The state superintendent, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, shall fix the amount of compensation or expenses of any of the personnel of the schools, which shall be paid upon the requisition of the state superintendent and warrant issued thereunder by the State Auditor out of the funds appropriated by the Legislature in a lump sum upon the basis of budgetary requirements submitted by the Superintendent of Education or out of funds otherwise made available. The entire expense of administering the schools shall never exceed the amount appropriated therefor, plus funds received from sources other than state appropriations. For a violation of this provision, the superintendent shall be liable, and he and the sureties on his bond shall be required to restore any excess. However, if for any reason within the two-year period beginning July 1, 2014, a new Superintendent of the School for the Blind, Superintendent of the School for the Deaf or other administrative or instructional personnel are employed by the department, the employment shall not be subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, except as otherwise provided in Section 25-9-127(4).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 149; Laws, 1992, ch. 338, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 602, § 14; Laws, 1995, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 491, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2014.).

§ 43-5-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 148, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 6785-04; Laws, 1936, ch. 180; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 416]

§ 43-5-11.
Annual report of Board.

The State Board of Education shall make a report to every annual term of the Legislature, showing the needs and condition and status of the School for the Blind and the School for the Deaf. Such report to the Legislature shall show how the money appropriated to the schools has been expended during the preceding year, beginning and ending with the fiscal year of each school. Such report shall exhibit the salaries paid to teachers, officers and employees and each and every item of receipt and expenditure. Each report shall be balanced and shall begin with the balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year. If any property belonging to the state or either school is used for profit such report shall show the expenses incurred in managing the property and the amount received from the same. Such report shall also show a summary of the gross receipts and gross disbursements for each fiscal year and shall show the money on hand at the beginning of the fiscal period of each school preceding each session of the Legislature and the necessary amount of expenses to be incurred from said date to January 1 next following.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4454; 1906, § 5031; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7930; 1930, § 7317; 1942, §§ 6785-02, 6800; Laws, 1936, ch. 180; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 391, § 7; Laws, 1970, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 150, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-5-13.
Braille and lip-reading to be taught.

Braille print, designated commonly as revised Braille Grade Two, shall be taught in the School for the Blind. The use of this print shall be included in the high school literary courses of students in such school. Every teacher or instructor in the School for the Deaf, whose duties include oral instruction of pupils, shall become acquainted with the most efficient and advanced methods of lipreading, but every teacher shall also master the manual alphabet in order to be able to communicate with pupils who cannot read lips and in order to aid and participate in student activities outside the classrooms. Every pupil entering the school shall be given oral instruction until it is clearly determined whether he can master lipreading to an extent enabling him to progress satisfactorily in his studies, but manual instruction shall be provided in all subjects for all pupils unable to progress satisfactorily under oral instruction alone. The State Board of Education may set and determine the additional requirements necessary for each teacher or instructor. All teachers and instructors must enter into written contracts of employment to indicate and cover the period for which they are respectively employed. Complete courses in shorthand and typewriting are to be offered at the School for the Deaf.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6785-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 535, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-5-15.
Pupils; classification; course of training.

Each of the two (2) schools shall be open to receive all pupils eligible to attend it, and shall provide for the proper lodging, maintenance, care and education while in attendance. A student shall not be admitted to or continue as a pupil in the School for the Blind whose acuity of vision is, or becomes, habitually greater than fifty percent (50%) of normal vision, and a pupil shall not be admitted or remain as a pupil in the school for the deaf whose ability to hear is customarily sufficient for him or her to attend the public schools provided for normal children. The board, in its discretion, shall establish the age of eligibility for students seeking admission to the schools. No person shall be admitted to either institution as a pupil who is not a bona fide resident of this state or who is not of good moral character.

The State Board of Education shall fix the amount to be paid, and the terms of payment, by pupils in each school for board, and the conditions of admission, subject to the provisions of this chapter; and shall admit free of charges, upon the certificate of the county superintendent of education of any county in the state, all pupils eligible to attend the school, provided the amount appropriated by the Legislature is sufficient properly to care for the same. Each school shall provide requisite facilities for every pupil therein to acquire as complete a literary and musical education as practicable; and shall provide and maintain an industrial department in which expert instruction shall be given in such trades and crafts as may be suited to render the pupil therein self-sustaining in after life.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6785-06; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 7; Laws, 1958, ch. 295; Laws, 1974, ch. 325; Laws, 1990, ch. 535, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-5-17.
Diplomas and certificates of proficiency.

The State Board of Education shall maintain the two (2) schools at as high a grade of work and education as may be practicable, and shall endeavor to give the pupils the same extent and scope of education that the pupils would receive if attending the public schools of this state; and shall have diplomas or certificates granted unto those pupils who have successfully finished the prescribed courses taught.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6785-07; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 535, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-5-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 354, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1977).

[Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5002; 1930, § 7303; 1942, § 6785-08; Laws, 1910, ch. 131; Laws, 1944, ch. 163, § 9]

§ 43-5-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 338, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1942, § 6785-11; Laws, 1956, ch. 286; Laws, 1958, ch. 304, §§ 1-3; Am, Laws, 1990, ch. 535, § 18]